California, session 20252026, AB2472.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8586.10 is added to the Government Code, to read:8586.10. (a) The Office of Emergency Services, in consultation with relevant state and local agencies, shall develop catastrophic plans.(b) For purposes of this section, “catastrophic plans” include the following disaster response plans developed by the Office of Emergency Services or the Federal Emergency Management Agency, or both:(1) Northern California Catastrophic Flood Response Plan. (2) Bay Area Earthquake Plan. (3) California Cascadia Subduction Zone Earthquake and Tsunami Response Plan. (4) Southern California Catastrophic Earthquake Plan. (5) Catastrophic Wildfires in the Wildland Urban Interface.(6) Pandemic Influenza incident plan. Incident Plan.(7) Chemical, Biological, Radiological, Nuclear, Explosive Incident Plan.